Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 7. No absolute, arbitrary power.

Absolute, arbitrary power over the lives, liberty and property of freemen exists nowhere in a republic, not even in the largest majority.

Neither property rights nor contract rights are absolute,

but are relative. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

One who assails the classification in a law must carry the burden

of showing that it does not rest upon any reasonable basis, but is essentially arbitrary. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963); Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Defendant’s conviction for sexual contact with a resident of a correctional facility did not violate her due process rights under either the state or federal constitutions because the statutes at issue clearly proscribed her conduct, the State had an undeniable interest in ensuring the relationship of state prisoners and the state officers who supervised their confinement was not undermined by sexual contact, consensual or otherwise, and, although defendant raised the Wyoming constitutional argument below and on appeal, her argument largely echoed her argument under the federal constitution and she provided no analysis of any of the requisite factors or legal reasons justifying resort to independent state grounds. Sheesley v. State, 2019 WY 32, 437 P.3d 830,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 2019).

And mere assertion of discrimination is insufficient. —

A person contesting the constitutionality of a statute must do more than make bald assertions of what he thinks is discriminatory. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963).

Reasonable basis required for different legislation as to different classes. —

There must be some difference which furnishes a reasonable basis for different legislation as to different classes, and the differences must not be arbitrary and without just relation to the subject of the legislation. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

And sustaining facts assumed. —

If any state of facts can be reasonably conceived which sustains the classification made by a statute, such facts will be assumed. Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

Right to associate with one's family is a fundamental liberty under Wyoming constitution.

In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Legislature may not prohibit occupations, unless detrimental

to public welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Removal of public officer by governor. —

Statute authorizing governor to remove public officer from office does not authorize arbitrary exercise of power. State ex rel. Wyckoff v. Ross, 31 Wyo. 500, 228 P. 636,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1924).

Contract between the United States and an irrigation district

which vested arbitrary power in the secretary of the interior over the property of the landowners of the district violated the spirit of this section. Owl Creek Irrigation Dist., 71 Wyo. 30, 253 P.2d 867,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1953).

Regulation of use of highways. —

Control of highways may in certain cases be extended to prohibiting use, and legislature may subject private carriers to appropriate regulations. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Courts must determine in first instance whether legislature can prohibit use of highways in particular case and whether regulating amounting to prohibiting is reasonable. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

State or municipal highway regulations must be reasonable, operate with equality and have some tendency to accomplish object in view. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Statute prohibiting use of highways by motor transportation companies, except under certificate and subject to regulation by public service commission, is void as applied to private carriers. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Regulation of motor carriers. —

The provisions of § 56, ch. 65, Laws 1935, regulating motor carriers, which authorized the public service commission to initiate appropriate civil proceedings to enforce obedience to, or for violation of, the act did not violate this section. Public Serv. Comm'n v. Grimshaw, 49 Wyo. 158, 53 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1935).

Requirement that railroads fence rights-of-way. —

The fact that railroads are required to fence their rights-of-way while motor transports are not required to fence a highway right-of-way is not discriminatory so as to make the requirement unconstitutional. Chicago & N. W. R.R. v. Bishop, 390 P.2d 731,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1964).

Prohibition of water variances

does not violate this section in that it is an exercise of absolute and arbitrary power; does not deny due process by denying a fair opportunity to challenge applicable water quality standards; and does not deny equal protection of the laws by discriminating between water and other pollutant dischargers. United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Given various means by which a corporation could present its views as to a water turbidity standard, including opportunity to participate in the promulgation process and to assure that there was procedural compliance, opportunity to obtain judicial review, if it was affected in fact by the rule adopted, and opportunity to seek the amendment or repeal of the rule, the corporation's rights to procedural due process were not infringed by the prohibition of water variances under § 35-11-601(o). United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Cheyenne “Sunday Closing Ordinance.” —

The Cheyenne “Sunday Closing Ordinance” is so permeated with unreasonable, arbitrary, capricious, discriminatory and oppressive provisions that it cannot stand, and the means adopted are without substance in accomplishing the end in view, as a legitimate exercise of the police power. Therefore, it is directly violative of this section. Nation v. Giant Drug Co., 396 P.2d 431,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1964).

Fair Trade Act. —

The former Fair Trade Act was in conflict with and in violation of this section. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Unfair competition. —

Section

40-4-107

(repealed), providing against unfair competition, did not violate the provisions of this section. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Requiring disclosure of amount of virgin wool in article offered for sale. —

Statute requiring disclosure by label of amount of virgin wool contained in woolen articles offered for sale was valid exercise of police power, not denying due process or privileges of citizens of United States. State v. W. S. Buck Mercantile Co., 38 Wyo. 47, 264 P. 1023,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1928).

Elimination of trading stamp business. —

An act to eliminate the trading stamp business, which, in the legislative view, presented an evil to be dealt with, could not be said to be either arbitrary or capricious and without reasonable relation to the evil sought to be suppressed. Steffey v. Casper, 358 P.2d 951,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1961).

Vagueness.

Provisions of the Wyoming Code of Judicial Conduct alleged to have been violated by a judge's refusal to marry same -sex couples were not void for vagueness where she was not being disciplined for her expression of her religious beliefs, but for her conduct in refusing to impartially perform her judicial functions, and an ordinary judge would have understood that refusal to conduct some marriages on the basis of the sexual orientation of the couple did not comply with the Code of Judicial Conduct. Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 639, 199 L. Ed. 2d 527, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 103 (U.S. 2018).

Prohibiting visitation of private residences by solicitors. —

An ordinance declaring visitation of private residences by solicitors, peddlers, itinerant merchants and the like for the purpose of soliciting orders for, or selling goods, wares and merchandise, a nuisance and imposing a penalty is valid, and not in violation of any constitutional or statutory provision. Town of Green River v. Bunger, 50 Wyo. 52, 58 P.2d 456,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1936).

Industrial Development Projects Act is constitutional.

Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967).

Compulsory dipping of sheep. —

Former statute, providing for compulsory dipping of all sheep kept or herded within the state, whether diseased or not, done under supervision of an inspector, and regulations of the state board, did not violate this section. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Failing to provide for compensation for United States citizens residing abroad. —

Statute providing for lump sum compensation payment to surviving dependent parents of deceased employee is not unconstitutional in failing to provide for United States citizens residing abroad, in absence of showing that there are dependent parents residing abroad. Cuthbertson v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 50 Wyo. 441, 62 P.2d 311,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1936).

Notation “careless driving” accompanied by reference to ordinance number

informs defendant of the nature of the offense charged with all the specificity needed. Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

The purpose behind uniform traffic citations is to provide for the speedy and effective disposition of traffic offenses. Within such an informal procedure it is not necessary that the charge be set forth with the same technical precision and formality as required in an information or verified complaint. All that is required is that the accused be informed of the nature of the offense with which he is charged. Such a requirement can be fulfilled by stating the commonly used name of the offense and the statute or ordinance violated. This is sufficient even if it means the accused may be required to inquire of the arresting officer or someone else exactly what the offense includes.
Swisse v. Sheridan, 561 P.2d 712,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1977).

Felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated for equal protection purposes. —

The defendant argued that he was being treated differently from a person who was serving the same amount of time in the state penitentiary because those in prison were afforded opportunities such as good time, vocational and educational programs, merit programs, library and recreational facilities and therapy programs which were not available in the county jail; however, this equal protection claim failed because felons and misdemeanants are not similarly situated persons for purposes of identification of a classification of similarly situated persons who are being treated differently. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation. —

Although the prosecutor gave no reason for the state's refusal to consent to treatment under §

7-13-301

(placing guilty, unconvicted, person on probation), the prosecutor, not the judge, controls the prosecution up to adjudication, and the court will not presume that suspect factors or arbitrary classifications exist. Thus, the refusal to consent to sentencing under §

7-13-301

was not arbitrary or an abuse of discretion. Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. Nov. 9, 1990); Hudson v. State, 800 P.2d 471,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1990); Heggen v. State, 800 P.2d 475,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1990); Cambio v. State, 800 P.2d 482,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1990); Gezzi v. State, 800 P.2d 485,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 1990); Kruzich v. State, 800 P.2d 489,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1990).

Transfer of prisoner from industrial institute to penitentiary. —

Statute empowering board of charities and reform to transfer prisoner in industrial institute to penitentiary if it should appear he had been previously convicted of crime becomes part of sentence as though extended into court record, does not deny due process and is not a change of sentence, but a carrying out of the original sentence. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Applied

in

DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Mills v. Reynolds, 807 P.2d 383,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

State v. Stern, 526 P.2d 344,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1974); State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977); Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991); Gonzales v. Grass Valley Mobile Home Park, 933 P.2d 484,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1997).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961); Weiss v. State ex rel. Cardine, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969).

Cited

in

McGarvey v. Swan, 17 Wyo. 120, 96 P. 697,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1908); Befumo v. Johnson, 2005 WY 114, 119 P.3d 936,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(2005); Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1918); State v. Loucks, 30 Wyo. 485, 222 P. 37,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1924); Moore v. Jarvis, 44 Wyo. 92, 8 P.2d 818,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1932); Fristam v. City of Sheridan, 66 Wyo. 143, 206 P.2d 741,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1949); Eastwood v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 76 Wyo. 247, 301 P.2d 818,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1956); Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970); Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975); Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977); Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996); Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996); RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999); Reiter v. State, 2001 WY 116, 36 P.3d 586,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2001); MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002); Befumo v. Johnson, 2005 WY 114, 119 P.3d 936,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(2005): Bhutto v. State, 2005 WY 78, 114 P.3d 1252,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(2005); In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. Apr. 6, 2006); Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Water Law — The State Engineer's Authority with Reference to Change of Use, Place of Use, Point of Diversion, and Means of Conveyance of Water Embraced by Water Permits. Green River Dev. Co. v. FMC Corp., 660 P.2d 339,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 59 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Worker's Compensation — The Dilemma of Co-Employee Immunity and the Confusion in the Aftermath of Mills II. Mills v. Reynolds, 837 P.2d 48,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 271 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Defense of good faith in action for damages against law enforcement official under 42 USC § 1983, providing for liability of person who, under color of law, subjects another to deprivation of rights, 61 ALR Fed 7.